District of Columbia statutes.
42-1011

General powers in trust.

A general power is in trust when any person or class of persons other than the grantee of such power is designated as entitled to the proceeds, or any portion of the proceeds or other benefits to result from the alienation of the lands, according to the power.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1353, ch. 854, § 1047

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-111.
1973 Ed., § 45-1011.